Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1239
Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund; created; use; investment; return of grant funds; when required.

(1) The Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund is created. Funding for the grant program described in section 81-1238 shall come from the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund. The Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include revenue transferred at the direction of the Legislature, grants, private contributions, and other sources. Transfers may be made from the fund to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The department shall establish a subaccount within the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund that shall be used to fund affordable housing and related land parcel preparation activities under the Economic Recovery Act as described in subdivisions (4)(d) and (e) of section 81-12,241.

(3) The department shall administer the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund and may seek additional private or nonstate funds to use in the grant program under the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act, including, but not limited to, contributions from the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and other interested parties.

(4) Interest earned by the department on grant funds shall be applied to the grant program.

(5) If a nonprofit development organization, or a recipient of subaccount funds described in subsection (2) of this section, fails to engage in a qualified activity within twenty-four months after receiving initial grant funding, the nonprofit development organization or recipient of subaccount funds shall return the grant proceeds to the department for credit to the General Fund.

(6) Beginning July 1, 2032, any funds held by the department in the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 15;

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB1069, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 34;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB288, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB1067, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 193.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB768, section 18, with LB1067, section 6, and LB1072, section 193, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB768 and LB1067 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1072 became operative April 8, 2026.
Economic Recovery Act, see section 81-12,238.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.